District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
18 act may be cited as the “Autonomous Vehicles Amendment Act of 2025”.
19 Sec. 2. The Autonomous Vehicle Act of 2012, effective Apr. 23, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-278;
20 D.C. Official Code § 50-2351 et seq.) is amended as follows:
21 (a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 50-2351) is amended to read as follows:
22 “Sec. 2. Definitions.
23 For the purposes of this chapter, the term:
24 (1) "Associated autonomous vehicle" means an autonomous vehicle that an autonomous
25 vehicle testing entity identifies in its autonomous vehicle testing permit application pursuant to §
26 50-2352.01, and any subsequent autonomous vehicles approved to operate pursuant to § 50-
27 2352.01(f)(1) or permitted by law to operate without subsequent approval.
28 (2) "Automated driving system" means the hardware and software that are collectively
29 capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis, regardless of whether
30 it is limited to a specific operational design domain.
1

31 (3) "Autonomous operation" means the performance of the entire dynamic driving task
32 by an autonomous driving system, beginning upon the performance of the entire dynamic driving
33 task by an autonomous driving system and continuing until the autonomous driving system is
34 disengaged.
35 (4) "Autonomous vehicle" means a motor vehicle equipped with an autonomous driving
36 system, regardless of whether the vehicle is under autonomous operation.
37 (5) "AV testing entity" means a person or entity applying for or issued an AV testing
38 permit by the Department.
39 (6) "AV testing permit" means a permit issued by the Department pursuant to § 50-
40 2352.01.
41 (7) "Department" means the District Department of Transportation.
42 (8) "Director" means the Director of the District Department of Transportation.
43 (9) "Dynamic driving task" means all of the real-time operational and tactical functions
44 collectively required to operate a vehicle in on-road traffic, excluding the strategic functions such
45 as trip scheduling and selection of destinations and waypoints, and including:
46 (A) Lateral vehicle motion control via steering;
47 (B) Longitudinal motion control via acceleration and deceleration;
48 (C) Monitoring the driving environment via object and event detection,
49 recognition, classification, and response preparation;
50 (D) Object and event response execution;
51 (E) Maneuver planning; and
52 (F) Enhancing conspicuity via lighting, signaling, and gesturing.
2

53 (10) “Fully autonomous vehicle” means a vehicle equipped with an automated driving
54 system designed to function without a human driver as a level 4 or 5 system under SAE J3016B.
55 (11) “Human driver” means a natural person in the vehicle with a valid license to operate
56 a motor vehicle who controls all or part of the dynamic driving task.
57 (12) "Minimal risk condition" means a condition to which a test operator or autonomous
58 driving system brings a vehicle to reduce the risk of a crash when a trip cannot or should not be
59 completed, such as bringing the vehicle to a complete stop.
60 (13) “On-demand autonomous vehicle network” means a transportation service network
61 that uses a software application or other digital means to dispatch or otherwise enable the pre-
62 arrangement of transportation with fully autonomous vehicles for purposes of transporting
63 passengers or goods, including for-hire transportation and transportation of passengers or goods
64 for compensation.
65 (14) "Operate" means collectively, the activities performed by a test operator or an
66 autonomous driving system to perform the entire dynamic driving task for an associated
67 autonomous vehicle.
68 (15) "Operational design domain" means the operating conditions under which a given
69 automated driving system is specifically designed to function, including environmental,
70 geographical, and time-of-day restrictions, and/or the requisite presence or absence of certain
71 traffic or roadway characteristics.
72 (16) “Public roadway” means a street, road, or public thoroughfare that allows motor
73 vehicles.
74 (17) "Remote operator" means an employee, contractor, or other designee of the
75 autonomous testing entity who is not physically present in an associated autonomous vehicle, but
3

76 is actively monitoring the autonomous operation of the vehicle in real time and is able to operate
77 the vehicle or is able to communicate with occupants of the vehicle.
78 (18) “Request to intervene” means a notification by an automated driving system to a
79 human driver, that the human driver should promptly begin or resume performance of part or all
80 of the dynamic driving task.
81 (19) “SAE J3016B” means the Taxonomy and Definitions for Terms Related to Driving
82 Automation Systems for On-Road Motor Vehicles published by SAE International in June 2018.”
83 (20) "Testing" means the operation of an associated autonomous vehicle on public
84 roadways to assess or demonstrate the associated autonomous vehicle's capabilities, including
85 operating an associated autonomous vehicle with occupants other than a test operator.
86 (21) "Test operator" means an employee, contractor, or other designee of the autonomous
87 vehicle testing entity who engages an autonomous driving system and performs, in real time, part
88 or all of the dynamic driving task.
89 (22) “Traffic control device” means a traffic signal, traffic sign, electronic traffic sign,
90 pavement marking, or other sign, device, or apparatus designed and installed to direct moving
91 traffic.
92 (b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code §50-2352) is revived as of July 11, 2025, and amended
93 to read as follows:
94 “Section 3. Autonomous vehicles permitted and registration requirements.
95 (a) A person or entity may operate a fully autonomous vehicle on the public roads of this
96 state without a human driver provided that the automated driving system is engaged and the
97 vehicle meets the following conditions:
4

98 (1) If a failure of the automated driving system occurs that renders that system
99 unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task relevant to its intended operational design
100 domain, the fully autonomous vehicle will achieve a minimal risk condition;
101 (2) The fully autonomous vehicle is capable of operating in compliance with the
102 applicable traffic and motor vehicle safety laws and regulations of the District when reasonable
103 to do so, unless an exemption has been granted by the Department; and
104 (3) When required by federal law, the vehicle bears the required manufacturer's
105 certification label indicating that at the time of its manufacture it has been certified to be in
106 compliance with all applicable Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards, including reference to
107 any exemption granted by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.
108 (b) Prior to operating a fully autonomous vehicle on the public roads of the District
109 without a human driver, a person or entity shall submit a law enforcement interaction plan to the
110 Department that describes:
111 (1) How to communicate with a fleet support specialist who is available during
112 the times the vehicle is in operation;
113 (2) How to safely remove the fully autonomous vehicle from the roadway and
114 steps to safely tow the vehicle;
115 (3) How to recognize whether the fully autonomous vehicle is in autonomous
116 mode; and
117 (4) Any additional information the manufacturer or owner deems necessary
118 regarding hazardous conditions or public safety risks associated with the operation of the fully
119 autonomous vehicle.
5

120 (c) An autonomous vehicle must be properly registered pursuant to the District of
121 Columbia Revenue Act of 1937, approved August 17, 1937 (50 Stat. 679; D.C. Official Code §
122 50-1501 et seq.), to operate on a public roadway.
123 (1) If a fully autonomous vehicle is registered in the District, the vehicle shall be
124 identified on the registration as a fully autonomous vehicle.
125 (2) If a fully autonomous vehicle is titled in the District, the vehicle shall be
126 identified on the title as a fully autonomous vehicle.”
127 (c) Section 3c (D.C. Official Code § 50-2352.03) is amended as follows:
128 (1) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
129 (d) In the event of a crash of a fully autonomous vehicle:
130 (A) The fully autonomous vehicle shall remain on the scene of the crash when
131 required by D.C. Official Code § 50-2201.05c, consistent with its capability under Section 3.
132 (B) The owner of the fully autonomous vehicle, or a person on behalf of the
133 vehicle owner, shall provide to the Department copies of any collision reports relating to
134 collisions in the District that are provided to the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration
135 pursuant to the Second Amended Standing General Order 2021-01. Any such reports shall be
136 provided to the Department within one day of the provision to the National Highway Traffic
137 Safety Administration.”
138 (d) New sections 4b, 4c, 4d, 4e, 4f, 4g and 4h are added to read as follows:
139 “Sec. 4b. Licensing.
140 (a) When an automated driving system installed on a motor vehicle is engaged:
141 (1) The automated driving system is considered the driver or operator, for the
142 purpose of assessing compliance with applicable traffic or motor vehicle laws and shall be
6

143 deemed to satisfy electronically all physical acts required by a driver or operator of the vehicle;
144 and
145 (2) The automated driving system is considered to be licensed to operate the
146 vehicle.”.
147 “Sec. 4c. On-demand autonomous vehicle network.
148 (a) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network shall be permitted to operate pursuant to
149 District laws governing the operation of transportation network companies, taxis, or any other
150 ground transportation for-hire of passengers, with the exception that any provision of law that
151 reasonably applies only to a human driver would not apply to the operation of fully autonomous
152 vehicles with the automated driving system engaged on an on-demand autonomous vehicle
153 network.”.
154 “Sec. 4d. Insurance.
155 (a) Before operating a fully autonomous vehicle on public roads in the District without a
156 human driver, a person shall submit proof of financial responsibility satisfactory to the
157 Department that the fully autonomous vehicle is covered by insurance or proof of self-insurance
158 that satisfies the requirements of applicable Chapter 13 of Title 50 of the D.C. Official Code
159 (D.C. Official Code § 50-1301.01 et seq.)”.
160 “Sec. 4e. Operation of a motor vehicle with an automated driving system by a human
161 driver
162 (a) A person may operate a motor vehicle equipped with an automated driving system
163 capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task if:
7

164 (1) Such automated driving system will issue a request to intervene whenever the
165 automated driving system is not capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task with the
166 expectation that the person will respond appropriately to such a request; and
167 (2) The automated driving system is capable of being operated in compliance with
168 Chapter 22 of Title 50 of the D.C. Official Code (D.C. Official Code § 50-2201.01 et seq.) when
169 reasonable to do so unless an exemption has been granted by the Department.
170 (b) Nothing in this Act prohibits or restricts a human driver from operating a fully
171 autonomous vehicle equipped with controls that allow for the human driver to control all or part
172 of the dynamic driving task.”.
173 “4f. Operation of commercial vehicles.
174 (a) A fully autonomous vehicle that is also a commercial motor vehicle pursuant to
175 Chapter 1 of Title 50 of the D.C. Official Code (D.C. Official Code § 50-101 et seq.) may
176 operate pursuant to District laws governing the operation of commercial motor vehicles, except
177 that any provision that by its nature reasonably only applies to a human driver does not apply to
178 such a vehicle operating with the automated driving system engaged.”
179 “4g. Vehicle equipment standards.
180 (a) A fully autonomous vehicle that is designed to be operated exclusively by the
181 automated driving system for all trips is not subject to motor vehicle equipment laws or
182 regulations of this state that: (1) relate to or support motor vehicle operation by a human driver
183 seated in the vehicle; and (2) are not relevant for an automated driving system.”
184 “4h. Controlling Authority:
185 (a) Unless otherwise provided in this chapter and notwithstanding any other provision of
186 law, fully autonomous vehicles and automated driving systems are governed exclusively by this
8

187 Act. The Department is the sole and exclusive District agency that may implement the provisions
188 of this Act.
189 (b) No other District agency or political subdivision may prohibit the operation of fully
190 autonomous vehicles, automated driving systems, or on-demand autonomous vehicle networks,
191 or otherwise enact or keep in force rules or ordinances that would impose taxes, fees, or other
192 requirements (including performance standards), specific to the operation of fully autonomous
193 vehicles, automated driving systems, or on-demand autonomous vehicle networks in addition to
194 the requirements of this Act.”
195 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
196 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
197 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
198 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
199 Sec. 4. Effective date.
200 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
201 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
202 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
203 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
9